zh-CN: 刹车灯开关触点类型: 转换 (SPDT; 双回路（两个独立回路）; NO/NC); 常闭 (NC); 常开 (NO); 其他
vi: Kiểu tiếp điểm công tắc đèn phanh: Chuyển đổi (SPDT; Mạch kép (hai mạch độc lập); NO/NC); Thường đóng (NC); Thường mở (NO); Khác
nb: Kontakttype for bremselysbryter: Veksel (SPDT; Tokrets (to uavhengige kretser); NO/NC); Normalt lukket (NC); Normalt åpen (NO); Annet
ko: 브레이크등 스위치 접점 유형: 전환형(SPDT; 듀얼 회로(두 개의 독립 회로); NO/NC); 평상시 닫힘(NC); 평상시 열림(NO); 기타
bg-BG: Тип контакт на превключвател на спирачните светлини: Превключващ (SPDT; Двукръгов (два независими кръга); NO/NC); Нормално затворен (NC); Нормално отворен (NO); Други
pt-PT: Tipo de contacto do interruptor da luz de travão: Comutador (SPDT; Circuito duplo (dois circuitos independentes); NO/NC); Normalmente fechado (NC); Normalmente aberto (NO); Outro
sv: Typ av kontaktknapp för bromsljus: Växlande (SPDT; Dubbelkrets (två oberoende kretsar); NO/NC); Normalt sluten (NC); Normalt öppen (NO); Övrigt
pl: Typ styku przełącznika świateł hamowania: Przełączne (SPDT; Dwuobwodowe (dwa niezależne obwody); NO/NC); Normalnie zamknięte (NC); Normalnie otwarte (NO); Inne
zh-TW: 煞車燈開關接點類型: 轉換 (單刀雙擲; 雙迴路 (兩個獨立迴路); 常開/常閉); 常閉 (NC); 常開 (NO); 其他
el: Τύπος επαφής διακόπτη φώτων φρένων: Μεταγωγικός (SPDT; Διπλό κύκλωμα (δύο ανεξάρτητα κυκλώματα); NO/NC); Κανονικά κλειστός (NC); Κανονικά ανοιχτός (NO); Άλλο
ru: Тип контакта выключателя стоп-сигнала: Переключающий (SPDT; Двухконтурный (два независимых контура); NO/NC); Нормально закрытый (NC); Нормально открытый (NO); Другое
da: Stiktype for bremselyskontakt: Skifte (SPDT; Dobbeltkreds (to uafhængige kredsløb); NO/NC); Normalt lukket (NC); Normalt åben (NO); Andet
nl: Type contact van remlichtschakelaar: Wisselschakelaar (SPDT; Dubbel circuit (twee onafhankelijke circuits); NO/NC); Normaal gesloten (NC); Normaal open (NO); Overig
hu: Féklámpakapcsoló érintkezési típusa: Váltóérintkezős (SPDT; Kétkörös (két független áramkör); NO/NC); Alaphelyzetben zárt (NC); Alaphelyzetben nyitott (NO); Egyéb
tr: Fren lambası anahtarı kontakt tipi: Değiştirici (SPDT; Çift devreli (iki bağımsız devre); NA/NK); Normalde kapalı (NK); Normalde açık (NA); Diğer
de: Kontakttyp für Bremslichtschalter: Wechsler (SPDT; Zweikreis (zwei unabhängige Schaltkreise); NO/NC); Öffner (NC); Schließer (NO); Sonstige
ro-RO: Tipul contactului întrerupătorului luminii de frână: Comutare (SPDT; Circuit dublu (două circuite independente); NO/NC); Normal închis (NC); Normal deschis (NO); Altele
lt-LT: Stabdžių žibinto jungiklio kontaktų tipas: Perjungiamasis (SPDT; Dviejų grandinių (dvi nepriklausomos grandinės); NO / NC); Paprastai uždaras (NC); Paprastai atviras (NO); Kitas
pt-BR: Tipo de contato do interruptor da luz de freio: Comutador (SPDT; Circuito duplo (dois circuitos independentes); NA/NF); Normalmente fechado (NF); Normalmente aberto (NA); Outro
ja: ブレーキライトスイッチコンタクトタイプ: 切替式 (SPDT; デュアル回路 (2つの独立回路); NO/NC); ノーマリークローズ (NC); ノーマリーオープン (NO); その他
th: ประเภทของหน้าสัมผัสสวิตช์ไฟเบรก: การสลับ (SPDT; วงจรคู่ (สองวงจรอิสระ); NO/NC); ปกติปิด (NC); ปกติเปิด (NO); อื่นๆ
fi: Jarruvalokatkaisimen kontaktityyppi: Vaihtokytkin (SPDT; Kaksipiirinen (kaksi erillistä piiriä); NO/NC); Normaalisti suljettu (NC); Normaalisti avoin (NO); Muu
sk-SK: Typ kontaktu spínača brzdového svetla: Prepínací (SPDT; Dvojokruhový (dva nezávislé okruhy); NO/NC); Normálne zatvorený (NC); Normálne otvorený (NO); Iný
hr-HR: Vrsta kontakta prekidača za svjetlo kočnice: Preklopni (SPDT; Dvokružni (dva nezavisna kruga); NO/NC); Normalno zatvoreni (NC); Normalno otvoreni (NO); Ostalo
fr: Type de contact du contacteur de feux stop: Inverseur (SPDT; Double circuit (deux circuits indépendants); NO/NC); Normalement fermé (NC); Normalement ouvert (NO); Autre
es: Tipo de conector de interruptores de luces de freno: Conmutación (SPDT; Doble circuito (dos circuitos independientes); NA/NC); Normalmente cerrado (NC); Normalmente abierto (NA); Otro
sl-SI: Način aktivacije kontakta zavornih luči: Preklopni (SPDT; Dvojni krogotok (dva neodvisna krogotoka); NO/NC); Normalno zaprto (NC); Normalno odprto (NO); Drugo
it: Tipo di contatto dell'interruttore della luce freno: Scambio (SPDT; Circuito doppio (due circuiti indipendenti); NO/NC); Normalmente chiuso (NC); Normalmente aperto (NO); Altro
cs: Typ kontaktu spínače brzdových světel: Přepínací (SPDT; Dvouokruhový (dva nezávislé okruhy); NO/NC); Normálně sepnutý (NC); Normálně rozepnutý (NO); Jiné
en: Brake light switch contact type: Changeover (SPDT; Dual circuit (two independent circuits); NO/NC); Normally closed (NC); Normally open (NO); Other